Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
ALTERNATIVES - INVESTIGATION

16-11-101. Alternatives in sentencing - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 239, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-101.

L. 73:

p. 503, § 1.

L. 76:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended, p. 545, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1)(b) amended, p. 993, § 2, effective July 1; (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(h) amended, p. 861, § 2, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

(1)(d) repealed and (1)(h) amended, pp. 672, 664, §§ 24, 1, effective July 1; (1)(h) amended, p. 679, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1253, § 2, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 88:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1049, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(b.5) added, p. 262, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1)(i) added, p. 13, § 4, effective September 13.

L. 95:

(1)(i)(I) amended, p. 1095, § 11, effective May 31; (1)(b.5) amended and (2) added, p. 1279, § 17, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1842, § 5, effective July 1; (1)(i)(I) amended, p. 1688, § 18, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 98:

(1)(j) added, p. 1290, § 8, effective November 1.

L. 99:

(1)(i)(II) amended, p. 43, § 3, effective March 15; (3) added, p. 316, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1182, § 8, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 2002, 3rd Ex. Sess.:

(1)(c) amended, p. 32, § 23, effective July 12.

16-11-101.5. Collection of restitution - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 669, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(4) added, p. 862, § 2, effective February 26.

L. 96:

(1) amended and (5) added, p. 1776, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1551, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1.5) added, p. 56, § 7, effective March 15; (6) added, p. 899, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 1044, § 5, effective September 1.

16-11-101.6. Collection of fines and fees - methods - charges - judicial collection enhancement fund - definition.

If the defendant is assessed any fines, fees, costs, surcharges, or other monetary assessments with regard to the sentencing or other disposition of a felony, misdemeanor, petty offense, civil infraction, traffic offense, or traffic infraction and does not pay all amounts assessed in full on the date of the assessment, the defendant shall pay to the clerk of the court an additional time payment fee of twenty-five dollars. The time payment fee may be assessed once per case; except that, if amounts owed in the case have still not been paid in full one year after the date of the assessment, the fee may be assessed annually until the defendant has fully satisfied his or her financial obligation in the case. In addition, there may be assessed against a defendant a late penalty fee of ten dollars each time a payment toward the fines, fees, costs, surcharges, or other amounts owed is not received on or before the date due. If the court determines that the defendant does not have the financial resources to pay a time payment fee or a late penalty fee, the court may waive or suspend a time payment fee or a late penalty fee. Amounts collected are credited first against the time payment and any late penalty fees assessed under this subsection (1), then against any fines, and finally against any costs. The time payment fee and late penalty fee described in this subsection (1) do not apply to a person under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or the person's parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

All time payment fees and late penalty fees collected shall be credited to the judicial collection enhancement fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. In addition, reasonable costs incurred and collected by the state shall be credited to the fund. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from the fund to the judicial department for administrative and personnel costs incurred in collecting restitution, fines, costs, fees, and other monetary assessments. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys and any interest shall remain in the fund for appropriation to the judicial department for ongoing enforcement and collection of restitution, fines, fees, costs, surcharges, and other monetary assessments.

To collect on past due orders of fines or fees, the state may employ any method available to collect state receivables, including assigning such accounts to private counsel or private collection agencies under section 24-30-202.4 (2), C.R.S. Any fees or costs of the private counsel or collection agency shall also be added to the amount due, but such fees and costs shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the amount collected.

On past due orders, the court may, on its own motion or through the use of a collections investigator, direct that a certain portion of a defendant's earnings, not to exceed fifty percent, be withheld and applied to any unpaid fines or fees, if such an order does not adversely impact the defendant's ability to comply with other orders of the court. An attachment of earnings under this section may be modified to a lesser or greater amount based upon changes in a defendant's circumstances as long as the amount withheld does not exceed fifty percent and may be suspended or canceled at the court's discretion. For purposes of this section, "earnings" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 13-54.5-101 (2), C.R.S., and shall include profits.

An attachment of earnings or a writ of garnishment to collect judgments from a garnishee's earnings for court assessments, including fines, fees, costs, restitution, and surcharges pursuant to this section or section 16-18.5-105:

Has priority over any other garnishment, lien, or income assignment except for a writ for arrearages for child support, for maintenance when combined with child support, for child support debts, or for maintenance or a writ previously served on the same garnishee pursuant to this section; and

Shall require the garnishee to withhold, pursuant to section 13-54-104 (3), C.R.S., the portion of earnings subject to garnishment at each succeeding earnings disbursement interval until the judgment is satisfied or the garnishment is released by the court or in writing by the judgment creditor.

During any period of time that a defendant is a state inmate as defined in section 17-1-102 (8), C.R.S., the superintendent of the correctional facility to which such defendant is assigned, or his or her designee, may fix the manner and time of payment of fines and fees and may direct that a portion of the wages of such defendant under section 17-24-122 (3), C.R.S., or compensation under section 17-24-114, C.R.S., be applied to any unpaid fines or fees.

The judicial department may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state treasurer, acting as the administrator of unclaimed property under the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", article 13 of title 38, for the purpose of offsetting against a claim for unclaimed property the amount of outstanding fines, fees, costs, or surcharges owed pursuant to law or an order entered by a court of this state by the person claiming unclaimed property. When an offset is to be made, the judicial department or the court to which the fines, fees, costs, or surcharges are owed shall notify the defendant in writing that the state intends to offset the defendant's outstanding fines, fees, costs, or surcharges against his or her claim for unclaimed property.

The state court administrator may adopt rules establishing the process by which an unclaimed property claimant may object to an offset and request an administrative review. The sole issues to be determined at the administrative review shall be whether the person is required to pay the fines, fees, costs, or surcharges pursuant to law or an order entered by a court of this state and the amount of the outstanding fines, fees, costs, or surcharges.

For purposes of this subsection (6), "claim for unclaimed property" means a cash claim filed in accordance with section 38-13-903.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1777, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

(1), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1044, § 6, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 1016, § 18, effective June 1; (1) amended, p. 1494, § 139, effective October 1.

L. 2005:

(6) added, p. 697, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2011:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 11-1076), ch. 178, p. 678, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(4) amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1394, § 8, effective June 7.

L. 2019:

(6)(a) and (6)(c) amended, (SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 466, § 5, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3110, § 11, effective July 6; (1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3164, § 174, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by SB 21-271 and HB 21-1315 were harmonized, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

16-11-101.7. Repayment of crime stopper reward - crime stopper reward reimbursement fund - created.

In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, after a defendant has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony offense, or enters into a plea bargain agreement concerning a felony offense which is reduced to a misdemeanor pursuant to such agreement, the court may order such defendant to repay all or part of any reward paid by a crime stopper organization that led to the defendant's arrest and conviction. The amount of such repayment may not exceed the actual reward paid by any crime stopper organization and shall be used solely for paying rewards.

Upon an order to repay all or part of a crime stopper reward, the court shall assess such repayment against the defendant in the same manner as other costs of prosecution are assessed against a defendant. The court shall order the defendant to:

Pay the entire amount when sentence is pronounced; or

Pay the entire amount on such later date as may be specified by the court.

Any order for the repayment of all or part of a crime stopper reward shall be prioritized in accordance with the provisions of section 18-1.3-204 (2.5), C.R.S.

All moneys collected by the court pursuant to this section, together with transmittal information which includes the court's docket number, the defendant's name, and the crime stopper organization which is designated to receive the repayment of reward, shall be promptly forwarded to the division of criminal justice created by section 24-33.5-502, C.R.S. Upon receipt, the division of criminal justice shall promptly transmit the moneys to the state treasurer who shall deposit them in the crime stopper reward reimbursement fund which is hereby created. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the division of criminal justice for the purposes of this section. The disbursement of any such moneys to the designated crime stopper organization shall be made by the division of criminal justice within thirty-five days after the date of deposit in the crime stopper reward reimbursement fund.

As used in this section, "crime stopper organization" has the same meaning as provided in section 16-15.7-102 (1).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1810, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1494, § 140, effective October 1.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 853, § 84, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-101.8. State income tax refund and lottery winnings offsets - fines, fees, costs, or surcharges - definitions.

In any case in which a defendant has an unsatisfied fine, fee, cost, or surcharge obligation imposed pursuant to law or a court order, the judicial department is authorized to transmit data concerning the obligation to the department of revenue for the purpose of conducting a data match and offsetting the obligation against a state income tax refund pursuant to section 39-21-108 (3) or lottery winnings pursuant to section 44-40-114. For any obligation identified by the judicial department for offset, the state court administrator shall:

On at least an annual basis, certify to the department of revenue the social security number of the defendant who is obligated to pay the obligation and the amount of the outstanding obligation. The department of revenue may request additional identifying information from the judicial department that is necessary to obtain an accurate data match.

Upon notification by the department of revenue of a data match, notify the appropriate court that a match has occurred and that an offset is pending and provide to the court the identifying information received from the department concerning the defendant whose state income tax refund is subject to the offset;

Provide or require the appropriate court to provide written notice to the defendant that the state intends to offset the defendant's obligation against his or her state income tax refund or lottery winnings and that the defendant has the right to object to the offset and request an administrative review; and

Upon receipt of funds for offset from the department of revenue, transmit the funds to the appropriate court.

The clerk of court shall apply funds received pursuant to this section to the defendant's outstanding fines, fees, costs, or surcharges. If the moneys received exceed the defendant's current obligation, the excess may be applied to other financial obligations the defendant owes the court or the judicial department. If no other financial obligations are owed, the clerk of court shall refund any excess moneys to the defendant.

The state court administrator may adopt rules establishing the process by which a defendant may object to an offset and request an administrative review. The sole issues to be determined at the administrative review shall be whether the person is required to pay the fines, fees, costs, or surcharges pursuant to law or an order entered by a court of this state and the amount of the outstanding fines, fees, costs, or surcharges.

The department of revenue is authorized to receive data from the judicial department and execute offsets of state income tax refunds and lottery winnings in accordance with this section and sections 39-21-108 (3) and 44-40-114.

As used in this section, "defendant" means any person who has been assessed a fine, fee, cost, or surcharge as an adult or juvenile pursuant to law or a court order.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1256, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (4) amended, (HB 19-1128), ch. 238, p. 2358, § 1, effective August 2.

16-11-102. Presentence or probation investigation.

Following the return of a verdict of guilty of a felony, other than a class 1 felony, or following a finding of guilt on such charge where the issues were tried to the court, or on a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to such a charge, or upon order of the court in any misdemeanor conviction, the probation officer shall make an investigation and written report to the court before the imposition of sentence. Each presentence report must include a substance abuse assessment or evaluation made pursuant to article 11.5 of this title and, unless waived by the court, must include, but not be limited to, information as to the defendant's family background, educational history, employment record, and past criminal record, including the defendant's past juvenile delinquency record, if any; information indicating whether the defendant has been convicted of unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9); an evaluation of the alternative dispositions available for the defendant; the information required by the court pursuant to article 18.5 of this title; a victim impact statement; and such other information as the court may require.
(1) (a) (I) Following the return of a verdict of guilty of a felony, other than a class 1 felony, or following a finding of guilt on such charge where the issues were tried to the court, or on a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to such a charge, or upon order of the court in any misdemeanor conviction, the probation officer shall make an investigation and written report to the court before the imposition of sentence. Each presentence report must include a substance abuse assessment or evaluation made pursuant to article 11.5 of this title and, unless waived by the court, must include, but not be limited to, information as to the defendant's family background, educational history, employment record, and past criminal record, including the defendant's past juvenile delinquency record, if any; information indicating whether the defendant has been convicted of unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9); an evaluation of the alternative dispositions available for the defendant; the information required by the court pursuant to article 18.5 of this title; a victim impact statement; and such other information as the court may require.

Except as described in subparagraph (VI) of this paragraph (a), if the defendant is convicted of a felony that occurred after July 1, 2004, and he or she is eligible to receive a sentence to the department of corrections, the report described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) must include the following statement:

(II.5) Except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(II.7) of this section, if the defendant is convicted on or after July 1, 2018, the report described in subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section must include the following statement:

(II.7) The report described in subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section need not include the statement described in subsection (1)(a)(II.5) of this section if the defendant:

Has been convicted of a felony that included an element that requires a victim to suffer a serious bodily injury and the victim suffered a permanent impairment of the function of any part or organ of the body;

Has been convicted of a crime of violence as described in section 18-1.3-406; or

Is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to section 16-22-103.

The district attorney's office shall prepare a victim impact statement. The department of human services shall provide the district attorney's office with the information necessary for the preparation of a victim impact statement. In addition, the court, in cases that it deems appropriate, may require the presentence report to include the findings and results of a professionally conducted psychiatric examination of the defendant.

No less than seventy-two hours prior to the sentencing hearing, the probation department shall provide copies of the presentence report, including any recommendations as to probation, to the prosecuting attorney and defense counsel or to the defendant if he or she is unrepresented. Upon request of either the defense or the district attorney, the probation department shall provide the presentence report at least seven days prior to the sentencing hearing. If the probation department informs the court it cannot provide the report at least seven days prior to the sentencing hearing, the court shall grant the probation department additional time to complete the report and shall reset the sentencing hearing so that the hearing is held at least seven days after the probation department provides the report.

The probation department shall transmit a copy of the presentence report, and the court shall transmit the mittimus to the department of corrections.

The report described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) need not include the statement described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) if:

The defendant is a sex offender for whom the sex offender management board has established separate and distinct release guidelines pursuant to section 18-1.3-1009, C.R.S.;

The defendant has at least one previous conviction for a crime of violence and must be referred by the department to the state board of parole pursuant to section 17-22.5-403 (3.5), C.R.S.;

The defendant is convicted of a class 1 felony or is a juvenile convicted as an adult of a class 1 felony; or

The probation department has reasonable grounds to believe that the language of the statement is inapplicable to the defendant. If the probation department elects to omit the statement pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (D), the probation department shall document in the report its grounds for doing so.

Each presentence report prepared regarding a sex offender, as defined in section 16-11.7-102 (2), with respect to any offense committed on or after January 1, 1996, shall contain the results of an evaluation and identification conducted pursuant to article 11.7 of this title; except that:

In addition, the presentence report shall include, when appropriate as provided in section 18-3-414.5, C.R.S., the results of the risk assessment screening instrument developed pursuant to section 16-11.7-103 (4)(d). Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, a presentence report shall be prepared for each person convicted as a sex offender, and the court may not dispense with the presentence evaluation, risk assessment, and report unless an evaluation and risk assessment has been completed within the last two years and there has been no material change that would affect the evaluation and risk assessment in the past two years.

(A) If the offense is a misdemeanor pursuant to the provisions of section 18-3-412.6, C.R.S., an evaluation and identification conducted pursuant to article 11.7 of this title shall not be ordered by the court;

(B) If the offense is a misdemeanor pursuant to title 42, C.R.S., or the history of sex-offending behavior was a misdemeanor sex offense committed when the defendant was a juvenile, an evaluation and identification conducted pursuant to article 11.7 of this title is not required but may be ordered by the court; and

(C) If the court accepts a stipulation that the defendant will not be sentenced to probation or if the defendant is already serving a sentence in the department of corrections, an evaluation and identification conducted pursuant to article 11.7 of this title is not required but may be ordered by the court.

The state court administrator may implement a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program to screen defendants for which the court has ordered an investigation pursuant to this section. If the state court administrator chooses to implement a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program, the state court administrator shall use the standardized behavioral or mental health disorder screening instrument developed pursuant to section 16-11.9-102 and conduct the screening in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to said section. The findings and results of any standardized behavioral or mental health disorder screening conducted pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) must be included in the written report to the court prepared and submitted pursuant to this subsection (1).

Prior to implementation of a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program pursuant to this subsection (1)(c), if implementation of the program would require an increase in appropriations, the state court administrator shall submit to the joint budget committee a request for funding in the amount necessary to implement the behavioral or mental health disorder screening program. If implementation of the program would require an increase in appropriations, implementation of the behavioral or mental health disorder screening program is conditional upon approval of the funding request.

(1.1) Repealed.

(1.5) A victim impact statement may include the following:

An identification of the victim of the offense;

An itemization of any economic loss suffered by the victim as a result of the offense, including any loss incurred after the offense and after criminal charges were filed formally against the defendant. The victim impact statement shall be prepared by the district attorney's office at the time the offense is filed and shall be updated to include any loss incurred by the victim after criminal charges were filed.

An identification of any physical injury suffered by the victim as a result of the offense, including information on its seriousness and permanence;

A description of any change in the victim's personal welfare or familial relationships as a result of the offense;

An identification of any request for psychological services initiated by the victim or the victim's family as a result of the offense;

An evaluation of the victim's and the victim's children's safety if probation is granted;

Any other information related to the impact of the offense upon the victim that the court requires.

(1.7) Each presentence report shall also include information from the offender and any other source available to the probation officer regarding the offender's estate, as defined in section 18-1.3-701 (5)(b), C.R.S., and other pertinent financial information, for the purpose of determining whether such offender or juvenile has sufficient assets to pay all or part of such offender's or juvenile's cost of care, as defined in section 18-1.3-701 (5)(a), C.R.S. The financial information obtained from the offender shall be submitted in writing and under oath.

(1.8) At the request of either the prosecution or the defense, each presentence report prepared regarding a youthful offender, as defined in section 18-1.3-407, who is eligible for sentencing to the youthful offender system pursuant to section 18-1.3-407.5, 19-2.5-801 (5), or 19-2.5-802 (1)(d)(I)(B) must include a determination by the warden of the youthful offender system whether the youthful offender is acceptable for sentencing to the youthful offender system. When making a determination, the warden shall consider the nature and circumstances of the crime, the circumstances and criminal history of the youthful offender, the available bed space in the youthful offender system, and any other appropriate considerations.

(1.9) Each presentence report must also:

Include the results of an actuarial assessment of the offender's criminological risks and needs;

Provide sufficient information to allow the court to consider:

Whether the offender is a suitable candidate for a sentencing option that does not involve incarceration or a combination of sentencing options that does not involve incarceration; and

The appropriate conditions to impose if a defendant is sentenced to probation;

Indicate whether the offender meets the minimum eligibility requirements as provided in sections 18-1.3-104 (1)(b.5) and 18-1.3-204 (2)(a)(III.5) for participation in restorative justice practices;

Describe the projected costs, if known, that are associated with each sentencing option that is available to the court; and

Set forth the purposes of title 18, C.R.S., with respect to sentencing, as such purposes are described in section 18-1-102.5, C.R.S.

The report of the probation officer and the procedures to be followed at the time sentence is imposed and final judgment is entered shall be as required by the Colorado rules of criminal procedure. In addition to the requirements of such rules, the report shall include a statement showing the amount of time during which the defendant was imprisoned awaiting trial upon the charge resulting in conviction.

The court, upon its own motion or upon the petition of the probation officer, may order any defendant who is subject to presentence investigation or who has made application for probation to submit to a mental and physical examination.

The court, with the concurrence of the defendant and the prosecuting attorney, may dispense with the presentence examination and report; except that the information required by section 18-1.3-603 (2), C.R.S., and a victim impact statement shall be made in every case. The amount of restitution shall be ordered pursuant to section 18-1.3-603, C.R.S., and article 18.5 of this title and endorsed upon the mittimus.

After receiving the presentence report and before imposing sentence, the court shall afford the defendant an opportunity to make a statement in his or her own behalf and to present any information in mitigation of punishment. The prosecution also shall be given an opportunity to be heard on any matter material to the imposition of sentence. The court shall then sentence the defendant pursuant to the provisions of this article and section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Following the return of a verdict of guilty of a felony, or a finding of guilt on such charge where the issues were tried to the court, or on a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to such a charge, the district attorney may file with the court identification photographs and fingerprints of the defendant or defendants, and such identification photographs and fingerprints shall become part of the court record. Such identification photographs and fingerprints of the defendant or defendants shall constitute prima facie evidence of identity under section 18-1.3-802, C.R.S.

"If the defendant is sentenced to the Department of Corrections, he or she may not serve his or her entire sentence in prison but may be released to community corrections or parole. The defendant's Parole Eligibility Date (PED) occurs after he or she has served fifty or seventy-five percent of his or her sentence, as provided in section 17-22.5-403, Colorado Revised Statutes, less any authorized earned time.
If the defendant is sentenced to the Department of Corrections, he or she may be eligible for a reduction in the length of his or her sentence by earned time. Regular earned time is up to ten or twelve days per month, not to exceed thirty percent of the defendant's sentence; however, the defendant may be eligible for further limited reductions through the application of various types of earned time provided in statute and administered pursuant to the policy of the Department of Corrections.
If the defendant is sentenced to the Department of Corrections, he or she may be eligible for release, to await parole in a community corrections facility, if such release is approved by the local community corrections board. If the defendant was not convicted of a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406 (2), Colorado Revised Statutes, he or she may be moved to a community corrections placement as early as sixteen months prior to his or her PED. If the defendant was convicted of a crime of violence, he or she cannot be moved to a community corrections placement earlier than one hundred eighty days prior to his or her PED.
A defendant's eligibility for community corrections or parole does not necessarily mean that community corrections or parole will be granted. The inmate locator on the internet website of the Department of Corrections can provide additional information regarding the sentence of an individual defendant.
The provisions of this statement do not apply to a defendant who has been sentenced to the youthful offender system within the Department of Corrections."

Each defendant may, at the time of conviction or at any time thereafter, apply to the court for an order of collateral relief of the consequences of the defendant's conviction pursuant to the provisions of section 18-1.3-107, Colorado Revised Statutes.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 240, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-102.

L. 77:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 862, § 3, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 81:

(6) added, p. 950, § 2, effective May 27; (1) and (4) amended, p. 941, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) and (4) amended and (1.5) added, p. 651, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 733, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 680, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 862, § 3, effective February 26.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1.1) added, p. 76, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 436, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 454, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 94:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2650, § 123, effective July 1; (1.1) repealed and (1.7) added, pp. 1362, 1356, §§ 5, 1, effective July 1; (1.5)(b) amended, p. 1050, § 5, effective July 1; (1.5)(e.5) added, p. 2036, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(b) amended, p. 465, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 1778, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(4) amended, p. 519, § 6, effective April 30.

L. 99:

(1)(a) amended, p. 315, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, p. 1045, § 7, effective September 1.

L. 2001:

(4) amended, p. 1271, § 20, effective June 5.

L. 2002:

(1)(c) added, p. 573, § 1, effective May 24; (1)(a) amended, p. 1182, § 9, effective July 1; (1.7), (4), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1494, § 141, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) amended, p. 253, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 2009:

(1.8) added, (HB 09-1122), ch. 77, p. 279, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1.8) amended, (HB 10-1413), ch. 264, p. 1204, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 11-1138), ch. 236, p. 1027, § 8, effective May 27; (1.9) added, (HB 11-1180), ch. 96, p. 282, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1395, § 9, effective June 7; (1)(b) amended, (HB 12-1346), ch. 220, p. 946, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 13-229), ch. 272, p. 1427, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 15-1042), ch. 119, p. 361, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1297, § 120, effective May 25; IP(1.9) amended and (1.9)(b.5) added, (HB 17-1039), ch. 58, p. 182, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(II.5) and (1)(a)(II.7) amended, (HB 18-1344), ch. 259, p. 1590, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1.8) amended, (HB 21-1091), ch. 175, p. 955, § 2, effective May 24; (1.8) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 713, § 24, effective October 1; (1.8) amended, (HB 21-1091), ch. 175, p. 957, § 5, effective October 1.

16-11-102.3. Genetic testing of convicted offenders - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1264, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 953, § 1, effective March 31, 2002.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1147, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, p. 1183, § 10, effective July 1; (1)(b) amended, p. 1495, § 142, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(7) added by revision, pp. 1687, 1693, §§ 1, 17.

L. 2007:

(1)(i) amended and (1)(i.5) added, p. 727, § 9, effective July 1.